Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.040

Public hearing—Publication of notice.

Notice of the public hearing by the county legislative authority on the proposed incorporation shall be by one publication in not more than ten nor less than three days prior to the date set for said hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area proposed to be incorporated. Said notice shall contain the time and place of said hearing.

[ 1986 c 234 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.040. Prior: 1957 c 173 s 4; prior: 1953 c 219 s 3; 1890 p 131 s 2, part; 1888 p 221 ss 1, 2, part; 1877 p 173 ss 1, 2, part; 1871 p 51 s 1, part; RRS s 8884, part.]